Utah statutes.
78B-1-203.   Effectiveness of interpreter determined.

Before appointing an interpreter, the appointing authority shall make a preliminary determination, on the basis of the proficiency level established by the Utah division of rehabilitation services and on the basis of the hearing-impaired person's testimony, that the interpreter is able to accurately communicate with and translate information to and from the hearing-impaired person involved.  If the interpreter is not able to provide effective communication with the hearing-impaired person, the appointing authority shall appoint another qualified interpreter.

